Utah statutes.
58-44a-503.   Penalty for unlawful conduct.
(1) Any individual who violates the unlawful conduct provisions of Subsection
58-44a-501(1) is guilty of a third degree felony.
(2)  Any individual who violates the unlawful conduct provisions of Subsection
58-44a-501(2), (3), or (4) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
(3)  Subject to Subsection (4), the division may assess administrative
penalties in accordance with the provisions of Section 58-44a-402 for acts of
unprofessional or unlawful conduct, or any other appropriate administrative
action in accordance with the provisions of Section 58-44a-401.
(4)  If a licensee has been convicted of violating Section 58-44a-501 prior to
an administrative finding of a violation of the same section, the licensee may
not be assessed a administrative penalty under this chapter for the same
offense for which the conviction was obtained.
